Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.400

Agent authority—Health care.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, where language in a power of attorney grants general authority with respect to health care matters:

(1) The agent shall be authorized to act as the principal's personal representative pursuant to the health insurance portability and accountability act, sections 1171 through 1179 of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d, as amended, and applicable regulations for all purposes thereunder, including but not limited to accessing and acquiring the principal's health care related information.

(2) The agent shall be authorized to provide informed consent for health care decisions on the principal's behalf. If a principal has appointed more than one agent with authority to make mental health treatment decisions in accordance with a directive under chapter 71.32 RCW, to the extent of any conflict, the most recently appointed agent shall be treated as the principal's agent for mental health treatment decisions unless provided otherwise in either appointment.

(3) Unless he or she is the spouse, state registered domestic partner, father or mother, or adult child or brother or sister of the principal, none of the following persons may act as the agent for the principal: Any of the principal's physicians, the physicians' employees, or the owners, administrators, or employees of the health care facility or long-term care facility as defined in RCW 43.190.020 where the principal resides or receives care. Except when the principal has consented in a mental health advance directive executed under chapter 71.32 RCW to inpatient admission or electroconvulsive therapy, this authorization is subject to the same limitations as those that apply to a guardian under chapter 11.130 RCW.

[ 2020 c 312 s 722; 2016 c 209 s 217.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.